District of Columbia statutes.
49-1004

Establishment of the Office of Veterans Affairs Fund.

(a)

There is established an Office of Veterans Affairs Fund (“Fund”) into which monies received from federal payments, grants, donations, and other funds for the Office shall be deposited. The Fund shall be continuing. Revenues deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the General Fund at the end of any fiscal year or at any other time, but shall be continually available to the Office for the purposes and functions described in this chapter, subject to authorization by Congress in an appropriations act.

(b)

The Mayor shall report annually to the Council on the revenues and activities of the Fund.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 705, 48 DCR 6981

History

This section is referenced in § 50-1501.02a and § 50-1501.03.

Section References

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 705 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).

Emergency Legislation

Mayor's Orders

Establishment — Advisory Board on Veterans Affairs, see Mayor’s Order 2001-92, June 29, 2001 ( 48 DCR 6011).

Amendment of Mayor’s Order 2001-92, dated 6-22-01, Establishing the Advisory Board on Veterans Affairs for D.C. and Appointments, see Mayor’s Order 2002-142, August 30, 2002 ( 49 DCR 8406).